Maine, session 132, LD1383.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §1524 is enacted to read:
§1524. State divestment from perpetrators of international human rights violations
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Crime of apartheid" has the same meaning as in the Rome Statute of the
International Criminal Court, article 7, paragraph 2(h).
B. "Ethnic cleansing" means the systematic forced removal of an ethnic or religious
group from a given territory by another ethnic or religious group, often with the intent
to make the territory more ethnically or religiously homogeneous.
C. "Genocide" has the same meaning as in the Rome Statute of the International
Criminal Court, article 6.
D. "Perpetrator state" means a state, country or governing body found by an
independent and credible international body, including the United Nations,
International Criminal Court or similar tribunal, to have committed the crime of
apartheid, ethnic cleansing, genocide or a war crime.
E. "War crime" has the same meaning as in the Rome Statute of the International
Criminal Court, article 8, paragraph 2.
2. Prohibition on investments. The State may not invest funds, including any public
funds managed by the Maine Public Employees Retirement System under chapter 421, in
or enter into a procurement contract with a company, entity, person or financial institution
that operates in, directly benefits from or is associated with a perpetrator state. The State
shall divest all assets from a company, entity, person or financial institution that operates
in, directly benefits from or is associated with a perpetrator state within 12 months of the
determination of the perpetrator state's status as a perpetrator state by an independent and
credible international body.
3. Monitoring and reporting. The Office of the Treasurer of State, in collaboration
with human rights experts and organizations, shall establish a commission to monitor
international human rights reports and identify potential perpetrator states. By January 1st
of each year, the Office of the Treasurer of State shall submit a report from the commission
detailing the commission's activities and findings regarding compliance with this section
to the Governor and the Legislature.
4. Exceptions; waiver. This section does not apply to an investment or procurement
contract related to the provision of humanitarian aid, food, medicine or other essential
supplies aimed at alleviating the suffering of a population. The Governor may issue a
waiver of the provisions of subsection 2 related to an investment, procurement or
divestment if the Governor determines that the waiver will prevent significant harm to the
residents of this State or that the operation of this section will undermine national security
interests.
5. Legal challenges. The court shall address a legal challenge to the operation of this
section in an expedited manner.
Page 1 - 132LR2137(01)

6. Enforcement. The Attorney General shall enforce violations of this section by any
department, agency or other public or private person.
Sec. 2. State to divest within 12 months of effective date of this Act. Within
12 months of the effective date of this Act, the Office of the Treasurer of State shall divest
all public funds, including any public funds managed by the Maine Public Employees
Retirement System under the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 5, chapter 421, from a
perpetrator state as defined in Title 5, section 1524, subsection 1, paragraph D.